Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.23
Guest instructor, defined.

Guest instructor means an individual designated by the training program manager or principal instructor to provide instruction specific to the lecture, hands-on activities, or work practice components of a course.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 25.